Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 61. Motion Pictures and Entertainment Productions

154.61-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter:

“Above-the-line production crew” means employees involved with the production of a motion picture or entertainment production whose salaries are negotiated prior to commencement of production, such as actors, directors, producers, and writers;

“Animated production” means a nationally distributed feature-length film created with the rapid display of a sequence of images using 2-D or 3-D graphics of artwork or model positions in order to create an illusion of movement;

“Approved company” means an eligible company approved for incentives provided under KRS 141.383 and 154.61-020;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority created in KRS 154.20-010;

“Below-the-line production crew” means employees involved with the production of a motion picture or entertainment production except above-the-line production crew. “Below-the-line production crew” includes but is not limited to:

Casting assistants;

Costume design;

Extras;

Gaffers;

Grips;

Location managers;

Production assistants;

Set construction staff; and

Set design staff;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Compensation” means compensation included in adjusted gross income as defined in KRS 141.010;

“Documentary” means a production based upon factual information and not subjective interjections;

“Eligible company” means any person that intends to film or produce a motion picture or entertainment production in the Commonwealth;

“Employee” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;

“Enhanced incentive county” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Feature-length film” means a live-action or animated production that is:

More than thirty (30) minutes in length; and

Produced for distribution in theaters or via digital format, including but not limited to DVD, Internet, or mobile electronic devices;

“Industrial film” means a business-to-business film that may be viewed by the public, including but not limited to videos used for training or for viewing at a trade show;

“Kentucky-based company” has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011;

“Motion picture or entertainment production” means:
(15) (a)

“Motion picture or entertainment production” means:

The following if filmed in whole or in part, or produced in whole or in part, in the Commonwealth:

A feature-length film;

A television program;

An industrial film; or

A documentary; or

A national touring production of a Broadway show produced in Kentucky.

“Motion picture or entertainment production” does not include the filming or production of obscene material or television coverage of news or athletic events;

“Obscene” has the same meaning as in KRS 531.010;

“Person” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;

“Qualifying expenditure” means expenditures made in the Commonwealth for the following if directly used in or for a motion picture or entertainment production:
(18) (a)

“Qualifying expenditure” means expenditures made in the Commonwealth for the following if directly used in or for a motion picture or entertainment production:

The production script and synopsis;

Set construction and operations, wardrobe, accessories, and related services;

Lease or rental of real property in Kentucky as a set location;

Photography, sound synchronization, lighting, and related services;

Editing and related services;

Rental of facilities and equipment;

Vehicle leases;

Food; and

Accommodations.

“Qualifying expenditure” does not include Kentucky sales and use tax paid by the approved company on the qualifying expenditure;

“Qualifying payroll expenditure” means compensation paid to above-the-line crew and below-the line crew while working on a motion picture or entertainment production in the Commonwealth if the compensation is for services performed in the Commonwealth;

“Resident” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;

“Tax incentive agreement” means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.61-030 between the authority and the approved company; and

“Television program” means any live-action or animated production or documentary, including but not limited to:

An episodic series;

A miniseries;

A television movie; or

A television pilot;

that is produced for distribution on television via broadcast, cable, or any digital format, including but not limited to cable, satellite, Internet, or mobile electronic devices.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 156, § 17, effective June 29, 2021.

154.61-020.
Purposes — Tax incentives for motion pictures and entertainment productions.

The purposes of KRS 141.383 and this subchapter are to encourage:

The film and entertainment industry to choose locations in the Commonwealth for the filming and production of motion picture or entertainment productions;

The development of a film and entertainment industry in Kentucky;

Increased employment opportunities for the citizens of the Commonwealth within the film and entertainment industry; and

The development of a production and postproduction infrastructure in the Commonwealth for film production and touring Broadway show production facilities containing state-of-the-art technologies.

The authority, together with the Department of Revenue, shall administer the tax credit established by KRS 141.383, this section, and KRS 154.61-030.

To qualify for the tax incentive provided in subsection (5) of this section, the following requirements shall be met:

For an approved company that is also a Kentucky-based company that:

Films or produces a feature-length film, television program, or industrial film in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000);

Produces a national touring production of a Broadway show in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); or

Films or produces a documentary in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

For an approved company that is not a Kentucky-based company that:

Films or produces a feature-length film, television program, or industrial film in whole or in part in the Commonwealth, the minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); or

Films or produces a documentary in whole or in part in the Commonwealth or that produces a national touring production of a Broadway show, the minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures shall be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

Beginning on January 1, 2022, the total tax incentive approved under KRS 141.383 and this subchapter shall be limited to seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for calendar year 2022 and each calendar year thereafter.

To qualify for the tax incentive available under KRS 141.383 and this subchapter all applicants shall:
(5) (a)

To qualify for the tax incentive available under KRS 141.383 and this subchapter all applicants shall:

Begin filming or production within six (6) months of filing an application with the authority; and

Complete filming or production within two (2) years of the filming or production start date.

The tax credit shall be against the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401, and shall be refundable as provided in KRS 141.383.

For a motion picture or entertainment production filmed or produced in its entirety in an enhanced incentive county, the amount of the incentive shall be equal to thirty-five percent (35%) of the approved company’s:
(c) 1.

For a motion picture or entertainment production filmed or produced in its entirety in an enhanced incentive county, the amount of the incentive shall be equal to thirty-five percent (35%) of the approved company’s:

Qualifying expenditures;

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident and nonresident below-the-line production crew; and

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident and nonresident above-the-line production crew not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in payroll expenditures per employee.

To the extent the approved company films or produces a motion picture or entertainment production in part in an enhanced incentive county and in part a Kentucky county that is not an enhanced incentive county, the approved company shall be eligible to receive the incentives provided in this paragraph for those expenditures incurred in the enhanced incentive county and all other expenditures shall be subject to the incentives provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
2. a.

To the extent the approved company films or produces a motion picture or entertainment production in part in an enhanced incentive county and in part a Kentucky county that is not an enhanced incentive county, the approved company shall be eligible to receive the incentives provided in this paragraph for those expenditures incurred in the enhanced incentive county and all other expenditures shall be subject to the incentives provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection.

The approved company shall track the requisite expenditures by county. If the approved company can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the cabinet that it is not practical to use a separate accounting method to determine the expenditures by county, the approved company shall determine the correct expenditures by county using an alternative method approved by the cabinet.

For a motion picture or entertainment production filmed or produced in whole or in part in any Kentucky county other than in an enhanced incentive county, the amount of the incentive shall be equal to:

Thirty percent (30%) of the approved company’s:

Qualifying expenditures;

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to below-the-line production crew that are not residents; and

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to above-the-line production crew that are not residents, not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in payroll expenditures per employee; and

Thirty-five percent (35%) of the approved company’s:

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident below-the-line production crew; and

Qualifying payroll expenditures paid to resident above-the-line production crew not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in payroll expenditures per employee.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 156, § 18, effective June 29, 2021.

154.61-030.
Applications — Tax incentive agreements — Fee — Approval — Cost report.

An eligible company shall, at least thirty (30) days prior to incurring any expenditure for which recovery will be sought, file an application for tax incentives with the authority. The application shall include:

The name and address of the applicant;

Verification that the applicant is a Kentucky-based company;

The production script or a detailed synopsis of the script;

The locations where the filming or production will occur;

The anticipated date on which filming or production shall begin;

The anticipated date on which the production will be completed;

The total anticipated qualifying expenditures;

The total anticipated qualifying payroll expenditures for resident and nonresident above-the-line crew by county;

The total anticipated qualifying payroll expenditures for resident and nonresident below-the-line crew by county;

The address of a Kentucky location at which records of the production will be kept;

An affirmation that if not for the incentive offered under this subchapter, the eligible company would not film or produce the production in the Commonwealth; and

Any other information the authority may require.

The authority shall notify the eligible company within thirty (30) days after receiving the application of its status.

Upon receipt of the application and any additional information submitted, the authority shall consider all submitted information and, if appropriate, authorize the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the authority and the approved company, if the amount of anticipated tax credit from the application would not make the total tax credit approved for the calendar year exceed the annual tax credit cap under KRS 154.61-020(4).

The tax incentive agreement shall include the following provisions:

The duties and responsibilities of the parties;

A detailed description of the motion picture or entertainment production for which incentives are requested;

The anticipated qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures for resident and nonresident above-the-line and below-the-line crews by county;

The minimum combined total of qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures necessary for the approved company to qualify for incentives;

That the approved company shall:

Begin production within six (6) months of filing an application with the authority; and

Complete production within two (2) years of their production start date;

That the motion picture or entertainment production shall not include obscene materials and shall not negatively impact the economy or the tourism industry of the Commonwealth;

That the execution of the agreement is not a guarantee of tax incentives and that actual receipt of the incentives shall be contingent upon the approved company meeting the requirements established by the tax incentive agreement;

That the approved company shall submit to the authority within one hundred eighty (180) days of the completion of the motion picture or entertainment production a detailed cost report of the qualifying expenditures, qualifying payroll expenditures, and final script;

That the approved company shall provide the authority with documentation that the approved company has withheld income tax as required by KRS 141.310 on all qualified payroll expenditures for which an incentive under this subchapter is sought;

That, if the authority determines that the approved company has failed to comply with any of its obligations under the tax incentive agreement:

The authority may deny the incentives available to the approved company;

Both the authority and the Department of Revenue may pursue any remedy provided under the tax incentive agreement;

The authority may terminate the tax incentive agreement; and

Both the authority and the Department of Revenue may pursue any other remedy at law to which it may be entitled;

That the authority and the Department of Revenue shall monitor the tax incentive agreement;

That the approved company shall provide to the authority and the Department of Revenue all information necessary to monitor the tax incentive agreement;

That the authority may share information with the Department of Revenue and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue or any other entity the authority determines is necessary for the purposes of monitoring and enforcing the terms of the tax incentive agreement;

That the motion picture or entertainment production shall contain an acknowledgment that the motion picture or entertainment production was produced or filmed in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

That the approved company shall include screen credits in its final production, indicating the approved company received tax incentives from the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Terms of default;

The method and procedures by which the approved company shall request and receive the incentive provided under KRS 141.383 and 154.61-020;

That the approved company may be required to pay an administrative fee as authorized under subsection (5) of this section; and

Any other provisions deemed necessary or appropriate by the parties to the tax incentive agreement.

The authority may require the approved company to pay an administrative fee, the amount of which shall be established by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The administrative fee shall not exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the estimated amount of tax incentive sought or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater.

Prior to commencement of activity as provided in a tax incentive agreement, the tax incentive agreement shall be submitted to the Government Contract Review Committee established by KRS 45A.705 for review, as provided in KRS 45A.695, 45A.705, and 45A.725.

The authority shall notify the Department of Revenue upon approval of an approved company. The notification shall include the name of the approved company, the name of the motion picture or entertainment production, the estimated amount of qualifying expenditures, the estimated date on which the approved company will complete filming or production, and any other information required by the department .

Within one hundred eighty days (180) days of completion of the motion picture or entertainment production, the approved company shall submit to the authority a detailed cost report of:

Qualifying expenditures;

Qualifying payroll expenditures for resident and nonresident above-the-line crew by county;

Qualifying payroll expenditures for resident and nonresident below-the-line crew by county; and

The final script.

The authority, together with the secretary, shall review all information submitted for accuracy and shall confirm that all relevant provisions of the tax incentive agreement have been met.
(9) (a)

The authority, together with the secretary, shall review all information submitted for accuracy and shall confirm that all relevant provisions of the tax incentive agreement have been met.

Upon confirmation that all requirements of the tax incentive agreement have been met, the authority and the secretary shall review the final script, and if they determine that the motion picture or entertainment production does not:

Contain visual or implied scenes that are obscene; or

Negatively impact the economy or the tourism industry of the Commonwealth;

The Department of Revenue shall:

Verify that the approved company withheld the proper amount of income tax on qualifying payroll expenditures; and

Notify the authority of the total amount of refundable credit available on qualifying expenditures and qualifying payroll expenditures.

the authority shall forward the detailed cost report to the Department of Revenue for calculation of the refundable credit.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 156, § 19, effective June 29, 2021.